dev/infreq-apertium-nn-nb.nn.dix
    <pardef n="f/alle__vblex_adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>allast</l>
          <r>alle<s n="vblex"/><s n="pst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>alla</l>
          <r>alle<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>alle</l>
          <r>alle<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>alle</l>
          <r>alle<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>alli</l>
          <r>alle<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>all</l>
          <r>alle<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>all</l>
          <r>alle<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ell</l>
          <r>alle<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="t/ykke__vblex_adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>otte</l>
          <r>ykke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ykkast</l>
          <r>ykke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ykka</l>
          <r>ykke<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ykker</l>
          <r>ykke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ykke</l>
          <r>ykke<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ykk</l>
          <r>ykke<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ykte</l>
          <r>ykke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ykt</l>
          <r>ykke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kip/pe__vblex_adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>par</l>
          <r>pe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>past</l>
          <r>pe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>pa</l>
          <r>pe<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>pa</l>
          <r>pe<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>pa</l>
          <r>pe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>pa</l>
          <r>pe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>per</l>
          <r>pe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>pe</l>
          <r>pe<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>pe</l>
          <r>pe<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>p</l>
          <r>pe<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>te</l>
          <r>pe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>pe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="bestem/me__vblex_adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>de</l>
          <r>me<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>d</l>
          <r>me<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mast</l>
          <r>me<s n="vblex"/><s n="pst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ma</l>
          <r>me<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mer</l>
          <r>me<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>me</l>
          <r>me<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>m</l>
          <r>me<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>te</l>
          <r>me<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>me<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>me<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="f/innas__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ans</l>
          <r>innas<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>innas</l>
          <r>innas<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ins</l>
          <r>innas<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>unnes</l>
          <r>innas<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>unnis</l>
          <r>innas<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="var/ast__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ast</l>
          <r>ast<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ast</l>
          <r>ast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ast</l>
          <r>ast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ast</l>
          <r>ast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dest</l>
          <r>ast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>est</l>
          <r>ast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>st</l>
          <r>ast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>test</l>
          <r>ast<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="dagevis__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="fordi__cnjsub">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="cnjsub"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="og__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="i__pr">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  </pardefs>

    <e lm="bønfalle"><i>bønf</i><par n="f/alle__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="doggfalle"><i>doggf</i><par n="f/alle__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="varast">		 <i>var</i><par n="var/ast__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="i det heile">     <i>i<b/>det<b/>heile</i><par n="dagevis__adv"/></e>
<e lm="vissa">           <i>vissa</i><par n="dagevis__adv"/></e>
<e lm="utormåte">        <i>utormåte</i><par n="dagevis__adv"/></e>
<e lm="unogges">         <i>unogges</i><par n="dagevis__adv"/></e>
<e lm="tylt">            <i>tylt</i><par n="dagevis__adv"/></e>
<e lm="tusen">           <i>tusen</i><par n="dagevis__adv"/></e>
<e lm="tjåkande">        <i>tjåkande</i><par n="dagevis__adv"/></e>
<e lm="tidomtil">        <i>tidomtil</i><par n="dagevis__adv"/></e>
<e lm="takom">           <i>takom</i><par n="dagevis__adv"/></e>
<e lm="stups">           <i>stups</i><par n="dagevis__adv"/></e>
<e lm="stings">          <i>stings</i><par n="dagevis__adv"/></e>
<e lm="steikande">       <i>steikande</i><par n="dagevis__adv"/></e>
<e lm="so visst">        <i>so<b/>visst</i><par n="dagevis__adv"/></e>
<e lm="so pass">         <i>so<b/>pass</i><par n="dagevis__adv"/></e>
<e lm="so lenge">        <i>so<b/>lenge</i><par n="dagevis__adv"/></e>
<e lm="smikkande">       <i>smikkande</i><par n="dagevis__adv"/></e>
<e lm="sjeldnast">	 <i>sjeldnast</i><par n="dagevis__adv"/></e>
<e lm="seinst">          <i>seinst</i><par n="dagevis__adv"/></e>
<e lm="så sant">         <i>så<b/>sant</i><par n="dagevis__adv"/></e>
<e lm="saltande">        <i>saltande</i><par n="dagevis__adv"/></e>
<e lm="respektive">      <i>respektive</i><par n="dagevis__adv"/></e>
<e lm="pronto">          <i>pronto</i><par n="dagevis__adv"/></e>
<e lm="passim">          <i>passim</i><par n="dagevis__adv"/></e>
<e lm="over langs">      <i>over<b/>langs</i><par n="dagevis__adv"/></e>
<e lm="omskrevs">        <i>omskrevs</i><par n="dagevis__adv"/></e>
<e lm="omatt">           <i>omatt</i><par n="dagevis__adv"/></e>
<e lm="nyst">            <i>nyst</i><par n="dagevis__adv"/></e>
<e lm="noko så nær">     <i>noko<b/>så<b/>nær</i><par n="dagevis__adv"/></e>
<e lm="noe så nær">      <i>noe<b/>så<b/>nær</i><par n="dagevis__adv"/></e>
<e lm="nemlig">          <i>nemlig</i><par n="dagevis__adv"/></e>
<e lm="nærom">           <i>nærom</i><par n="dagevis__adv"/></e>
<e lm="mestsom">         <i>mestsom</i><par n="dagevis__adv"/></e>
<e lm="longo">           <i>longo</i><par n="dagevis__adv"/></e>
<e lm="like hendt">      <i>like<b/>hendt</i><par n="dagevis__adv"/></e>
<e lm="langveges">       <i>langveges</i><par n="dagevis__adv"/></e>
<e lm="læssom">          <i>læssom</i><par n="dagevis__adv"/></e>
<e lm="kvarhelst">       <i>kvarhelst</i><par n="dagevis__adv"/></e>
<e lm="korsvis">         <i>korsvis</i><par n="dagevis__adv"/></e>
<e lm="kje">             <i>kje</i><par n="dagevis__adv"/></e>
<e lm="ja so">           <i>ja<b/>so</i><par n="dagevis__adv"/></e>
<e lm="jamnan">          <i>jamnan</i><par n="dagevis__adv"/></e>
<e lm="iser">            <i>iser</i><par n="dagevis__adv"/></e>
<e lm="innanåt">         <i>innanåt</i><par n="dagevis__adv"/></e>
<e lm="ingaleis">        <i>ingaleis</i><par n="dagevis__adv"/></e>
<e lm="i forfjor">       <i>i<b/>forfjor</i><par n="dagevis__adv"/></e>
<e lm="hundande">        <i>hundande</i><par n="dagevis__adv"/></e>
<e lm="hoste">           <i>hoste</i><par n="dagevis__adv"/></e>
<e lm="hoselesta">       <i>hoselesta</i><par n="dagevis__adv"/></e>
<e lm="høgstnattes">     <i>høgstnattes</i><par n="dagevis__adv"/></e>
<e lm="hentande">        <i>hentande</i><par n="dagevis__adv"/></e>
<e lm="henda">           <i>henda</i><par n="dagevis__adv"/></e>
<e lm="heilende">        <i>heilende</i><par n="dagevis__adv"/></e>
<e lm="hakkande">        <i>hakkande</i><par n="dagevis__adv"/></e>
<e lm="fyrstundes">      <i>fyrstundes</i><par n="dagevis__adv"/></e>
<e lm="forvel">          <i>forvel</i><par n="dagevis__adv"/></e>
<e lm="for hand">        <i>for<b/>hand</i><par n="dagevis__adv"/></e>
<e lm="flunke">          <i>flunke</i><par n="dagevis__adv"/></e>
<e lm="flekkomtil">      <i>flekkomtil</i><par n="dagevis__adv"/></e>
<e lm="ettersidan">      <i>ettersidan</i><par n="dagevis__adv"/></e>
<e lm="etterdags">       <i>etterdags</i><par n="dagevis__adv"/></e>
<e lm="endåtil">         <i>endåtil</i><par n="dagevis__adv"/></e>
<e lm="einskildvis">     <i>einskildvis</i><par n="dagevis__adv"/></e>
<e lm="eileis">          <i>eileis</i><par n="dagevis__adv"/></e>
<e lm="dungevis">        <i>dungevis</i><par n="dagevis__adv"/></e>
<e lm="dorg">            <i>dorg</i><par n="dagevis__adv"/></e>
<e lm="dinest">          <i>dinest</i><par n="dagevis__adv"/></e>
<e lm="di heller">       <i>di<b/>heller</i><par n="dagevis__adv"/></e>
<e lm="dessmeir">        <i>dessmeir</i><par n="dagevis__adv"/></e>
<e lm="dessforutan">     <i>dessforutan</i><par n="dagevis__adv"/></e>
<e lm="der nede">        <i>der<b/>nede</i><par n="dagevis__adv"/></e>
<e lm="bortlengst">      <i>bortlengst</i><par n="dagevis__adv"/></e>
<e lm="åvelte">          <i>åvelte</i><par n="dagevis__adv"/></e>
<e lm="årligårs">        <i>årligårs</i><par n="dagevis__adv"/></e>
<e lm="andhæles">        <i>andhæles</i><par n="dagevis__adv"/></e>
<e lm="allstad">         <i>allstad</i><par n="dagevis__adv"/></e>
